Missouri, session 2026, HB2965.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 170, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 170.373, to read as follows:
170.373. 1. The state board of education shall convene a work group to develop
and recommend academic performance standards relating to one unit of credit of Black
history education and one unit of credit of Black literature education required by the
board. The work group shall include, but not be limited to, educators providing
instruction in Black history and Black literature in grades nine to twelve,
representatives from the department of elementary and secondary education, and
nonprofit organizations that focus on the study of Black history and Black literature.
The work group shall develop written curriculum frameworks relating to Black history
education and Black literature education that are designed to ensure that students attain
the knowledge, skills, and competencies necessary to properly educate students.
2. The state board of education shall adopt and implement academic
performance standards relating to Black history and Black literature for the 2027-28
school year and all subsequent school years.
3. (1) For the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent school years, each school
district shall require that after the completion of grade nine each student satisfactorily
completes one unit of credit of Black history education and one unit of credit of Black
literature education before receiving a high school diploma or certificate of graduation.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2965 2
(2) A school district may elect to waive the requirements of subdivision (1) of this
subsection for a student who transfers from outside the state to a Missouri high school if
the student can furnish documentation deemed acceptable by the school district of the
student's successful completion of a substantially similar course of instruction.
4. The requirements of section 160.514 shall not apply to this section.
✔